Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1188.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1321(a) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Section 1321. Collective Bargaining.--(a) School administrators employed by a city of the first class or employed by a school district of the first class A shall, through labor organizations or other representatives designated by fifty per centum (50%) or more of such school administrators, have the right to bargain collectively with their public employers concerning the terms and conditions of their employment, including compensation, hours, working conditions, retirement, pension and other benefits, and shall have the right to an adjustment or settlement of their grievances or disputes in accordance with the terms of this section. The Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board shall resolve disputes as to the items under this subsection in the same manner as it resolves disputes under the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the "Public Employe Relations Act."* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1188PN1436 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617